src/fst/morphology/stems/propernouns.lexc
LEXICON ProperNouns
  ProperNounsGeo ;
  ProperNounsPersons ;
  ProperNounsOther ;


LEXICON ProperNounsGeoPrefixed
  Alam-:Alam-# ProperNounsGeo ; 
  Edela-:Edela-# ProperNounsGeo ; 
  Ida-:Ida-# ProperNounsGeo ; 
  Indo-:Indo-# ProperNounsGeo ; 
  Kagu-:Kagu-# ProperNounsGeo ; 
  Kesk-:Kesk-# ProperNounsGeo ; 
  Kirde-:Kirde-# ProperNounsGeo ; 
  Ladina-:Ladina-# ProperNounsGeo ; 
  Loode-:Loode-# ProperNounsGeo ; 
  Lääne-:Lääne-# ProperNounsGeo ; 
  Lõuna-:Lõuna-# ProperNounsGeo ; 
  Põhja-:Põhja-# ProperNounsGeo ; 
  Suur-:Suur-# ProperNounsGeo ; 
  Väike-:Väike-# ProperNounsGeo ; 
  Ülem-:Ülem-# ProperNounsGeo ; 
